District of Columbia statutes.
47-309

Borrowing of funds by Mayor.

The Mayor is authorized to borrow funds from the United States Treasury in anticipation of the collection or receipt of revenues; provided, that each such borrowing is approved by the Council in advance of such borrowing by resolution.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-104, § 10, 27 DCR 3748
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-309.

Prior Codifications